Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ICE CASTLE AND WINTER FESTIVAL ON LAKE PHALEN.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of St. Paul to hold a winter festival on Lake Phalen that includes one or more ice castles that are suitably tailored to the area and provides opportunities for members of the community to carve and display their own ice sculptures. new text end